Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-316
Certificate of registration; issuance; fee.

The election commissioner or county clerk may issue a certificate of registration to any registered voter who requests a certificate verifying that he or she is a registered voter in the county and pays a fee of three dollars. The certificate of registration shall include the information contained in section 32-312 and shall be issued with the seal of the election commissioner or county clerk. All fees so collected shall be reported to the county board and remitted to the county treasurer at least once each month.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 78;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 37.